Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
22-3-408. Information on motor vehicles of state employees.

Upon forms prescribed by the Capitol Parking Control Committee, each administrative head of the departments and agencies of state government located in the State Capitol Building and upon the State Capitol grounds shall annually obtain information from each of his or her respective employees as to the make, model, and current license number of the motor vehicles owned by the employees and shall furnish the information to the secretary of the committee at such times as directed by the committee.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-253.

Subchapter 5

— Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 274, § 2: Feb. 22, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that legislative oversight should be provided for the construction of a monument on State Capitol grounds or the removal of a monument from the State Capitol grounds; that legislative oversight is currently only provided after a monument's construction or removal is approved by the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission; and that this act is immediately necessary because it ensures that the General Assembly have proper oversight of monuments on State Capitol grounds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-501. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Project” means expenditures for capital construction or for capital improvements, including landscaping on the State Capitol grounds, but shall not include:

(A)

Renovations, improvements, or remodeling within the interior of structures now existing on the State Capitol grounds;

(B)

Repair or maintenance that does not substantially change the existing use of space on the State Capitol grounds, that does not add additional square footage to existing buildings or facilities, and that does not change exterior building design; or

(C)

Individual plantings within an established landscaping plan that do not alter the overall plan concept;

(2)

“Project” or “capital improvement project” means and includes the location of memorials, fountains, monuments, sculptures, and other works of art, including proposals for the relocation of any fountains, memorials, or monuments and similar facilities on the State Capitol grounds;

(3)

“State agency” means any state board, commission, department, or any division thereof authorized by law to engage in capital construction or improvement projects on the State Capitol grounds; and

(4)(A)

“State Capitol grounds” means all land, parking areas, and streets which are under the jurisdiction of the Secretary of State.

(B)

This shall include the land, parking areas, and streets surrounding the State Capitol Building, the Capitol Hill Building, the Grounds Operations shop, and other land that is maintained by the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 665, §§ 3, 5; 1997, No. 1043, § 1; 2005, No. 1379, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (2), deleted former (A)-(C), (E)-(G), and deleted the former subdivision (D) designation.

22-3-502. Creation — Members, etc.

(a)(1)

There is created a Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission.

(2)

The commission shall be composed of ten (10) members as follows:

(A)

The Governor or a designee;

(B)

The Secretary of State or a designee who shall serve as the commission chair;

(C)

The Director of the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program;

(D)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

(E)

One (1) landscape architect in this state, to be named by the Secretary of State from a list of three (3) names submitted to him or her by the Arkansas Chapter of the American Society of Landscape Architects;

(F)

One (1) licensed architect in this state, to be named by the Secretary of State from a list of three (3) names submitted to him or her by the Arkansas Chapter of the American Institute of Architects;

(G)

Two (2) citizen members at large, to be appointed by the Secretary of State, who shall serve four-year terms; and

(H)

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint one (1) nonlegislator to serve at his or her pleasure as a member of the commission, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one (1) nonlegislator to serve at his or her pleasure as a member of the commission.

(b)

Members of the commission shall serve without pay, but they shall be reimbursed by funds of the Secretary of State for reasonable and necessary expenses in attending commission meetings and in the performance of duties of the commission if funds are provided for the reimbursement in accordance with the rate prescribed for state employees in state travel rules.

(c)(1)

The commission shall meet on the call of the chair or on written request by any four (4) of its members.

(2)

A majority vote of the voting members of the commission shall be necessary for the adoption of any action by the commission.

(d)(1)

The terms of office of the members of the commission appointed by the Secretary of State shall be four (4) years.

(2)(A)(i)

Within ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of the term of office of each professional member, the American Society of Landscape Architects may submit to the Secretary of State a list of three (3) names of licensed landscape architects for each position for which a term expires.

(ii)

Within ninety (90) days prior to the expiration of the term of office of each professional member, the American Institute of Architects may submit to the Secretary of State a list of three (3) names of licensed architects for each position for which a term expires.

(B)

Appointments expire June 30.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 665, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 250, § 216; 1997, No. 1043, § 2; 1997, No. 1354, § 40; 1999, No. 1264, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 1508, § 7; 2001, No. 1288, §§ 20, 21; 2005, No. 1379, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2357; 2019, No. 910, § 5682.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 665, § 2, provided, in part, that the appointive members shall be designated by the Governor so that the term of one member will expire on January 15, 1989, and the term of the other shall terminate on January 15, 1991, and their successors shall be appointed for terms of four years.

This section may be affected by the enactment of Acts 1995, No. 1211, codified as §25-16-901 et seq.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment by No. 1264 repealed the version of this section as amended by Acts 1997, No. 250; and rewrote this section.

The 1999 amendment by No. 1508 repealed the version of this section as amended by Acts 1997, No. 250.

The 2001 amendment inserted “to serve at his or her pleasure” following “nonlegislator” throughout (a)(2)(J) and made minor punctuation changes; and, in (d)(1), deleted “six (6) appointive” preceding “members” and inserted “appointed … State” following “commission.”

The 2005 amendment substituted “ten (10)” for “fifteen (15)” in (a)(2); deleted “and an ex officio member” from the end of (a)(2)(B); deleted former (a)(2)(E) and (H) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “Two (2)” for “Four (4)” in present (a)(2)(G); deleted “at least two (2) times a year or” following “shall meet” in (c)(1); and deleted “Governor and the” preceding “Secretary” in (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a)(2)(D).

22-3-503. Powers and duties.

(a)

The Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)

To recommend the acquisition of land for such expansion of the State Capitol grounds as may be required to meet the needs of state agencies;

(2)

To review and recommend to the Secretary of State on the location of monuments, memorials, fountains, and similar improvements on the State Capitol grounds or for the relocation of existing monuments, memorials, and fountains on the State Capitol grounds;

(3)

To review any permanent statue, statuary, fountain, monument, or memorial tablet to be erected in the public areas of the State Capitol Building or on its grounds for compliance with the adopted plan; and

(4)

To review proposed actions of the Secretary of State under §1-4-134 regarding the design, material, production, and method of display of the statue representing Daisy Lee Gatson Bates under §1-4-134(d)(1) or the statue representing John R. “Johnny” Cash under §1-4-134(d)(2), or both.

(b)

The commission shall have the right to accept donations in money, pictures, paintings, statuary fountains, and memorial tablets on behalf of the state for the State Capitol Building. In cases of money donations, the commission shall have the right to expend the money in decorations, either in the building or on the grounds thereof. To that end, the commission may make all necessary contracts for the expenditure of the funds.

(c)(1)

A monument shall not be constructed on or removed from the State Capitol grounds unless authorized by an act of the General Assembly.

(2)

The commission shall not consider the construction of a monument on the State Capitol grounds or the removal of a monument from the State Capitol grounds without legislative authorization under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 665, § 4; 1989, No. 880, § 1; 1997, No. 1043, § 3; 2005, No. 1379, § 3; 2017, No. 274, §
1; 2019, No. 1068, §
2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1068, § 4, provided: “Rules.

“(a)

The Secretary of State may promulgate rules necessary to implement this act.

“(b)(1)

If adopting necessary initial rules to implement this act, a final rule shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under §25-15-204(f):

“(A)

On or before March 1, 2020; or

“(B)

If approval under §10-3-309 has not occurred by March 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under §10-3-309.

“(2)

The Secretary of State shall file any necessary proposed rules with the Legislative Council under §10-3-309 sufficiently in advance of March 1, 2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before March 1, 2020”.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (a), deleted former (1), (2), (4) and (7) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted former (c); and redesignated former (d) as present (c).

The 2017 amendment rewrote (c).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(4).

22-3-504. Requests — Contents, hearings, etc.

(a)

Before any state agency shall undertake a capital improvement project, as defined in §22-3-501, on the State Capitol grounds, a request shall be filed with the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission for its review of the proposed project.

(b)

The Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission may require that the requests include:

(1)

Architectural and landscaping plans, if appropriate, for the project;

(2)

Sufficient information to demonstrate compliance with applicable standards for development; and

(3)

Sufficient information to demonstrate consistency of the project with zoning rules of the Capitol Zoning District Commission.

(c)

Upon receipt of a request for review of a project, the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission shall hold a public meeting for the purpose of obtaining the views of the public on the proposed project. Notices of meetings shall be mailed to interested persons, either by separate notice or by inclusion on the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission's meeting agenda, at least ten (10) days in advance of the meeting.

(d)

If, upon review of the request for review of the project, the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission believes that more information relating to the project is required, the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission may postpone action on the request and may ask the requesting agency or the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission staff to provide additional information.

(e)

If the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission determines that the proposed project is in the best interest of the use of space on the State Capitol grounds, the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission may give favorable advice.

(f)

No state agency shall undertake a capital improvement project, as defined in §22-3-501, on the State Capitol grounds unless the project is first submitted to and approved by the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 665, § 6; 1989, No. 880, § 2; 1997, No. 1043, § 4; 2005, No. 1379, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 2358.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “and” at the end of (b)(2); deleted former (b)(3); redesignated former (b)(4) as present (b)(3); and deleted “consistent with the Capitol Master Plan and with Capitol Zoning District Commission regulations and is” following “proposed project is” in (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(3).

Subchapter 6

— Twentieth Century War Veterans Monument

22-3-601 — 22-3-604. [Transferred.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This subchapter has been renumbered as §22-3-219.

Subchapter 7

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 8

— Governor's Mansion

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Preambles.

Acts 1953, No. 289, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, by reason of his position as Chief Executive of the State, it is necessary for the Governor to use the Governor's Mansion as a place of residence and entertainment for visiting dignitaries from without the state; and

“Whereas, it is often necessary for the Governor to spend relatively large sums of money in the purchase of food for such dignitaries and public officials and others who are called upon to assist in providing entertainment; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly has adopted the policy through the enactment of appropriation measures to provide for the maintenance of the Mansion and the Mansion Grounds; and

“Whereas, it appears that the best interests of the state will be served by providing that the maintenance appropriation for the Governor's Mansion be withdrawn by the Governor in equal monthly installments to be used by him for the payment of all expenses of upkeep of the Governor's Mansion and Grounds;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1883, No. 128, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1953, No. 289, § 3: approved Mar. 11, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the unusually large amount of expense involved and the short time within which the Governor had to prepare for the inauguration, and due to the pressure of business as a result of the convening of the General Assembly, it has been impossible for the Governor to account for all items of expense in the operation of the Governor's Mansion, and for such reasons the Governor shall withdraw from the maintenance appropriation account the proportionate monthly allotment, effective as of January 13, 1953, taking into consideration, however, all vouchers heretofore issued. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 203, § 7: Mar. 2, 1973; Acts 1973, No. 400, § 7: Mar. 20, 1973. Emergency clauses provided: “The General Assembly finds that the Governor's Mansion is in immediate need of repair and renovation, and that the immediate assistance of the Commission created hereby is necessary in aid of such improvements. Accordingly, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the public peace, health, and safety, shall be effective immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1992 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 6: Dec. 18, 1992. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly meeting in Second Extraordinary Session, that the Governor of the State of Arkansas has been elected to serve as President of the United States of America and will be sworn into that office on January 20, 1993; and that the State Supreme Court has determined the lawful succession to fill the office of Governor when it is vacant; and that the urgent problems confronting the State require the prompt and orderly implementation of this succession (which does not involve the habitation of the Mansion); and that his continued residence in the Governor's Mansion is necessary to provide for a smooth and effective transition between governors. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-801. State to provide mansion.

(a)

The State of Arkansas shall furnish to its governors a mansion in which to reside during their respective terms of office.

(b)

With the approval of the Governor, a former Governor may reside in the mansion for a period not exceeding forty-five (45) days after the date on which he or she ceases to be Governor.

(c)

With the approval of the Governor, a Governor-elect may reside in the mansion for a period not exceeding forty-five (45) days before the date on which he or she becomes Governor.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 128, § 1, p. 310; C. & M. Dig., § 4388; Pope's Dig., § 5403; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-303; Acts 1992 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 1.

Cross References.

Security for mansion and grounds, §12-8-108.

22-3-802. Maintenance — Use of appropriations.

(a)

Of the amounts from time to time appropriated by the General Assembly for the maintenance of the Governor's Mansion, a lump-sum monthly installment of one-twelfth (

1

/

12

) of the annual appropriation is authorized to be withdrawn by the disbursing officer of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission to be used by him or her for the payment of all expenses incurred in the operation of the mansion, including the purchase of food and all miscellaneous items of a minor nature, and the expenditure of the funds so withdrawn shall not be subject to the purchasing laws or the laws relating to either the preaudit or postaudit of expenditures.

(b)

The disbursing officer of the commission shall file with the Legislative Council an annual summary statement of expenditures made by him or her of the maintenance funds so withdrawn, together with a statement of the adequacy of the amount of the funds for operation of the mansion and grounds.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 289, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-306; Acts 1992 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 2.

22-3-803. Payrolls, purchase of equipment, and major repairs.

Payrolls, the purchase of equipment, and the expenses resulting from major repairs to the Governor's Mansion shall be paid upon vouchers issued in the normal course and shall be subject to applicable laws of the state as in the instance of the operation of the Governor's office.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 289, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-307.

22-3-804. Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission — Creation, members, and proceedings.

(a)(1)

There is created the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission to be composed of nine (9) members.

(2)(A)

Eight (8) of the members shall:

(i)

Be appointed by the Governor; and

(ii)

Serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

(B)

Each congressional district shall be represented by membership on the commission.

(3)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism or his or her designee shall serve as an ex officio voting member of the commission.

(b)

The Governor shall designate one (1) member of the commission as chair.

(c)

If a vacancy occurs by reason of resignation or otherwise, the Governor shall appoint a member to fill that vacancy.

(d)

The members of the commission shall receive no salary or other compensation for their services except that members appointed by the Governor may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq. for attending meetings of the commission.

(e)

Meetings of the commission may be called by the chair or the Governor upon at least three (3) days' written notice to the other members of the commission, to the Governor, and to the members of the Mansion Advisory Council created by §22-3-806.

(f)

The commission shall meet at least one (1) time each year.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 203, §§ 1-4; 1973, No. 400, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-313 — 12-316; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 217; 1997, No. 1113, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 85; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 85; 2019, No. 910, § 5683.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 126, provided:

“(a)

Except as provided in this section, provisions of this act altering the appointment structure of a task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity shall not shorten the term of any member of the task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity but shall be implemented by the filling of vacancies.

“(b)

The Governor may remove a member of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission who was appointed to the commission before the effective date [May 23, 2016] of Section 85 of this act.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism or his or her designee” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(3).

22-3-805. Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission — Powers and duties.

(a)

The Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)

To survey and investigate the condition of the Governor's Mansion, its appurtenant buildings, its grounds, and its contents, including furniture and fixtures;

(2)

To prepare and file with the Governor and the Legislative Council an annual Governor's Mansion report, to be filed on or before November 1 of each year, summarizing the results of the commission's surveys and investigations made under subdivision (a)(1) of this section and recommending any necessary repairs, improvements, replacements, or reconstruction of the Governor's Mansion, its appurtenant buildings, grounds, and contents, together with an itemized and detailed estimate of the costs thereof; and

(3)(A)

To solicit and accept gifts, grants, or donations of or for the purchase of furnishings, fixtures, works of art, trees, shrubs, landscaping, and similar contents and appurtenances.

(B)

However, no such gift, grant, or donation may be accepted without the approval of the Governor.

(b)

The Governor shall consult the commission before taking any action that would affect the historic value of the Governor's Mansion.

(c)

Any individual, corporation, or nonprofit association may solicit funds or engage in fundraising activities on behalf of the commission upon written permission by the commission and the Governor.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 203, § 5; 1973, No. 400, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-317; Acts 1997, No. 1113, § 2; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 86; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 86.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Governor's Mansion” for “mansion in (a)(1); deleted former (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(3) and (4) as present (a)(2) and (3); in (a)(2), substituted “Governor's Mansion” for “mansion” twice and “the commission's” for “its”; deleted “the commission and” preceding “the Governor” near the end of (a)(3)(B); inserted present (b) and redesignated former (b) as (c).

22-3-806. Mansion Advisory Council.

(a)

There is created a Mansion Advisory Council, to be composed of three (3) members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, three (3) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and any other persons as the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission or the Governor may select.

(b)

The council shall assist the commission in any manner requested by the commission.

(c)

Members of the council shall be notified of all meetings of the commission as provided in §22-3-804, shall have the right to take part in all meetings of the commission, and shall have and enjoy all rights and privileges of membership on the commission except the right to vote and to receive per diem payments.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 203, § 6; 1973, No. 400, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-318; Acts 2001, No. 1288, § 22.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment, in (a), deleted “of the Senate” preceding “appointed by the President,” and deleted “of the House of Representatives” preceding “appointed by the Speaker.”

Subchapter 9

— Arkansas Justice Building Act

Cross References.

Justice Building Construction Fund, §19-5-1087.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 24: approved Mar. 24, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared that the lack of adequate facilities for the expeditious and efficient conduct of the business of the Supreme Court of the State of Arkansas, of the Attorney General, of the Public Service Commission, and of the Workmen's Compensation Commission, adversely affects the public welfare, property and resources, and it is hereby found and declared that that there is an urgent and immediate need for the construction of adequate facilities for the housing of the Supreme Court, the Clerk, the Library, the Attorney General, the Public Service Commission, and the Workmen's Compensation Commission in order that the business of the same may be expeditiously and efficiently handled in the best public interest, and that adequate facilities can be made available immediately only by the constructing and financing of the Justice Building in the manner and pursuant to the provisions of this act. It is, therefore, declared that an emergency exists and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 632, § 6: Apr. 9, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared that the Arkansas Justice Building, as presently constituted, is in immediate need of reconstruction, improvement, extension and equipment, in order that agencies of the state occupying and using it may have sufficient space in which to effectively and properly carry out their operations and activities, which are essential to the welfare of the citizens and inhabitants of this state and that the immediate effect of this act is the only means by which such things can be accomplished. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being immediately necessary to the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 791, § 13: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the lack of adequate space and facilities currently available to the courts, library and offices listed in section 2 has seriously affected their ability to efficiently perform their duties and responsibilities and is causing unnecessary hardship and delay in the proper administration of justice necessary to the people of this state; that the immediate alleviation of this situation is necessary to protect and provide the administration of justice in the state, and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 8: Nov. 16, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that the various school district of this state may be able to effect substantial savings in total principal and interest payments by issuing refunding bonds authorized by this Act and that the authority conferred hereby should be available as soon as possible to permit more monies to be available for the use of the school districts of this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being essential for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 149, § 18: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-901. Title.

This subchapter shall be referred to and may be cited as the “Arkansas Justice Building Act”.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 375, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-601.